ja: 救急セットの内容物: 消毒用ワイプ; 包帯; 保冷剤; 使い捨て手袋; 非常用毛布; ガーゼパッド; 過酸化水素; 医療用テープ; ハサミ; 止血剤粉末; 体温計; ピンセット; その他
zh-TW: 急救工具套件零組件: 消毒濕紙巾; 繃帶; 冷敷; 醫用手套; 緊急防寒毯; 消毒無紡布紗墊; 過氧化氫; 醫用膠帶; 剪刀; 止血粉; 溫度計; 美容鑷子; 其他
hu: Az elsősegélykészlet összetevői: Antiszeptikus törlőkendők; Kötszerek; Hideg borogatás; Eldobható kesztyűk; Vészhelyzeti takaró; Gézpárnák; Hidrogén-peroxid; Orvosi ragtapasz; Olló; Vérzéscsillapító sebhintőpor; Hőmérő; Csipeszek; Egyéb
de: Bestandteile des Erste-Hilfe-Sets: Antiseptische Tücher; Bandagen; Kaltkompresse; Einweghandschuhe; Notfalldecke; Gazekompressen; Wasserstoffperoxid; Medizinisches Tape; Schere; Hämostatisches Pulver; Thermometer; Pinzette; Sonstiges
it: Componenti del kit di pronto soccorso: Salviette antisettiche; Bende; Impacco freddo; Guanti monouso; Coperta termica; Garze; Acqua ossigenata; Nastro medico; Forbici; Polvere emostatica; Termometro; Pinzette; Altro
nb: Komponenter i førstehjelpssett: Antiseptiske servietter; Bandasjer; Kaldkompress; Éngangshansker; Nødtepper; Gasbind; Hydrogenperoksid; Medisinsk tape; Sakser; Styptisk pulver; Termometer; Pinsetter; Annet
ro-RO: Componente trusă de prim ajutor: Șervețele antiseptice; Bandaje; Compresă rece; Mănuși de unică folosință; Pătură de urgență; Tampoane de tifon; Peroxid de hidrogen; Leucoplast; Foarfece; Pulbere stiptică; Termometru; Pensetă; Altele
en: First aid kit components: Antiseptic wipes; Bandages; Cold compress; Disposable gloves; Emergency blanket; Gauze pads; Hydrogen peroxide; Medical tape; Scissors; Styptic powder; Thermometer; Tweezers; Other
ko: 구급약품 키트 구성품: 방부제 물티슈; 붕대; 냉찜질; 일회용 장갑; 응급용 담요; 거즈 패드; 과산화수소; 의료용 테이프; 가위; 지혈 가루; 온도계; 족집게; 기타
pt-PT: Componentes do kit de primeiros socorros: Toalhetes antissépticos; Ligaduras; Compressa fria; Luvas descartáveis; Cobertor de emergência; Almofadas de gaze; Peróxido de hidrogénio; Adesivo médico; Tesouras; Pó estíptico; Termómetro; Pinças; Outro
cs: Součásti lékárničky: Antiseptické ubrousky; Obvazy; Studený obklad; Jednorázové rukavice; Nouzová přikrývka; Gázové polštářky; Peroxid vodíku; Zdravotní páska; Nůžky; Styptický prášek; Teploměr; Pinzety; Jiné
sv: Delar i förstahjälpensats: Antiseptiska våtservetter; Bandage; Kall kompress; Engångshandskar; Nödfiltar; Gasbindor; Väteperoxid; Medicinsk tejp; Saxar; Styptiskt pulver; Termometer; Pincetter; Övrigt
da: Komponenter til førstehjælpskasse: Antiseptiske servietter; Bandager; Kold komprimering; Engangshandsker; Nødtæppe; Gazepuder; Brintoverilte; Medicinsk tape; Sakse; Styptisk pulver; Termometer; Pincetter; Andet
el: Περιεχόμενο του κιτ πρώτων βοηθειών: Αντισηπτικά μαντηλάκια; Επίδεσμοι; Κρύα κομπρέσα; Γάντια μιας χρήσης; Κουβέρτα έκτακτης ανάγκης; Γάζες; Υπεροξείδιο του υδρογόνου; Ιατρική ταινία; Ψαλίδι; Στυπτική σκόνη; Θερμόμετρο; Τσιμπιδάκια φρυδιών; Άλλο
pl: Elementy zestawu pierwszej pomocy: Chusteczki antyseptyczne; Bandaże; Zimny kompres; Rękawiczki jednorazowe; Koc ratunkowy; Podkładki z gazy; Nadtlenek wodoru; Taśma medyczna; Nożyce; Proszek styptyczny; Termometr; Pęseta; Inne
fr: Composants de la trousse de premiers secours: Lingettes antiseptiques; Bandages; Compresse froide; Gants jetables; Couvertures de survie; Tampons de gaze; Peroxyde d’hydrogène; Ruban médical; Ciseaux; Poudre styptique; Thermomètre; Pinces à épiler; Autre
fi: Ensiapulaukun komponentit: Antiseptiset pyyhkeet; Sideharso; Kylmä kompressio; Kertakäyttöiset käsineet; Hätäpeite; Harsotyynyt; Vetyperoksidi; Lääketieteellinen teippi; Sakset; Jauhe verenvuodon tyrehdyttämiseen; Lämpömittari; Pinsetit; Muu
sk-SK: Súčasti lekárničky: Antiseptické obrúsky; Obväzy; Studený obklad; Jednorazové rukavice; Núdzová deka; Gázové tampóny; Peroxid vodíka; Zdravotnícka páska; Nožnice; Styptický prášok; Teplomer; Pinzeta; Iné
pt-BR: Componentes do kit de primeiros socorros: Toalhetes antissépticas; Bandagens; Compressa fria; Luvas descartáveis; Cobertor de emergência; Almofadas de gaze; Peróxido de hidrogênio; Fita médica; Tesouras; Pó estíptico; Termômetro; Pinças; Outro
vi: Thành phần của bộ sơ cứu: Khăn chống nhiễm trùng; Băng bột bó thạch cao; Gạc lạnh; Găng tay dùng một lần; Chăn dùng trong trường hợp khẩn cấp; Miếng gạc; Hydro peroxit; Băng keo y tế; Kéo; Bột cầm máu; Nhiệt kế; Nhíp; Khác
es: Componentes del botiquín de primeros auxilios: Toallitas antisépticas; Vendas; Compresa fría; Guantes desechables; Manta de emergencia; Almohadillas de gasa; Peróxido de hidrógeno; Cinta médica; Tijeras; Polvo hemostático; Termómetro; Pinzas; Otros
lt-LT: Pirmosios pagalbos vaistinėlės komponentai: Antiseptinės servetėlės; Tvarsčiai; Šaltas kompresas; Vienkartinės pirštinės; Gelbėjimo antklodė; Marlės tvarsčiai; Vandenilio peroksidas; Medicininė lipni juosta; Žirklės; Kraujavimą stabdanti pudra; Termometras; Pincetai; Kita
nl: Componenten EHBO-kit: Ontsmettende doekjes; Verband; Koud kompres; Wegwerphandschoenen; Nooddeken; Gaaskompressen; Waterstofperoxide; Medische tape; Scharen; Bloedstelpend poeder; Thermometer; Pincetten; Andere
ru: Состав набора для оказания первой помощи: Антисептические салфетки; Бинты; Холодный компресс; Одноразовые перчатки; Спасательное одеяло; Марлевые салфетки; Перекись водорода; Медицинская лента; Ножницы; Кровоостанавливающий порошок; Термометр; Пинцеты; Другой
hr-HR: Komponente kompleta za prvu pomoć: Antiseptičke maramice; Zavoji; Hladni oblog; Jednokratne rukavice; Pokrivač za hitne slučajeve; Jastučići od gaze; Vodikov peroksid; Medicinski flaster; Škare; Stiptički prah; Termometar; Pinceta; Ostalo
zh-CN: 急救套装组件: 消毒湿巾; 绷带; 冷敷袋; 一次性手套; 应急毯; 纱布垫; 过氧化氢; 医用胶带; 剪刀; 止血粉; 温度计; 美容镊子; 其他
th: ส่วนประกอบชุดปฐมพยาบาล: ผ้าเช็ดทำความสะอาดฆ่าเชื้อ; ผ้าพันแผล; แผ่นประคบเย็น; ถุงมือที่ใช้แล้วทิ้ง; ผ้าห่มฉุกเฉิน; ผ้ากอซ; ไฮโดรเจนเปอร์ออกไซด์; เทปที่ใช้ทางการแพทย์; กรรไกร; ผงยาห้ามเลือด; เทอร์โมมิเตอร์; แหนบ; อื่นๆ
tr: İlk yardım çantası bileşenleri: Antiseptik mendil; Bandajlar; Soğuk baskı; Tıbbi eldivenler; Acil durum battaniyesi; Gazlı bezler; Hidrojen peroksit; Tıbbi bant; Makas; Kan durdurucu toz; Termometre; Cımbızlar; Diğer
sl-SI: Sestavni deli kompleta prve pomoči: Antiseptični robčki; Povoji; Hladen obkladek; Rokavice za enkratno uporabo; Odeja za nujne primere; Blazinice iz gaze; Vodikov peroksid; Medicinski trak; Škarje; Stiptični prašek; Termometer; Pincete; Drugo
bg-BG: Компоненти на комплекта за първа помощ: Антисептични кърпички; Превръзки; Студен компрес; Ръкавици за еднократна употреба; Термо одеяло; Тампони от марля; Водороден прекис; Медицинска лента; Ножици; Стипцова пудра; Термометър; Пинсета; Други